Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3334
Animal therapist; additional disciplinary
grounds.

In
addition to the grounds for disciplinary action found in sections 38-178 and
38-179, a license to practice as a licensed animal therapist may be denied,
refused renewal, limited, revoked, or suspended or have other disciplinary
measures taken against it in accordance with section 38-196 when the applicant
or licensee is subjected to disciplinary measures with regard to his or her
license referred to under subdivision (1) of section 38-3332.

Laws 2009, LB463, § 11.